District of Columbia statutes.
38-2572.03

Evaluation and termination of hearing officers.

(a)

The State Superintendent of Education may establish a process for submitting the records of individual hearing officers to the community review panel for evaluation before exercising a contract option year.

(b)

The contract of a hearing officer may only be terminated for good cause and after the hearing officer has been given notice and an opportunity to be heard.

Mar. 10, 2015, D.C. Law 20-194, § 203, 61 DCR 12411

History